Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 96 The College and Career Success for All Students Act
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-96-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “The College and Career Success For All Students Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 350, § 1.

16-96-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter shall be to ensure that each Rhode Island student has a sufficient education for success after high school and that all students have equal access to a substantive and rigorous curriculum that is designed to challenge their minds, enhance their knowledge and skills, and prepare them for success in college and work.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 350, § 1.

16-96-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Advanced Placement course” means a course sponsored by the college board and offered for college credit at the high school level.

“Advanced Placement teacher” means a teacher of an advanced placement course.

“Pre-Advanced Placement” means set professional development resources and services that equip all middle and high school teachers with the strategies and tools they need to engage their students in active, high-level learning, thereby ensuring that every middle and high school student develops the skills, habits of mind, and concepts they need to succeed in advanced placement courses.

“Board of regents” means the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

“FAFSA” means the Free Application for Federal Student Aid form that allows eligible students the opportunity to obtain federal financial aid through the U.S. Department of Education to assist with the cost of postsecondary education.

“Rhode Island alternative financial aid application” means the form that allows eligible students who are not permitted to fill out the FAFSA an opportunity to apply for state financial aid, regardless of their immigration status, to assist with the cost of postsecondary education.

“Vertical team” means a group of teachers and educators from different grade levels in a given discipline who work cooperatively to develop and implement a vertically aligned program aimed at helping students from diverse backgrounds acquire the academic skills necessary for success in advanced placement courses and other challenging courses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 297, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 298, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

16-96-4.
Teacher training.

Subject to appropriation, the state board of governors for higher education and the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education will work jointly to establish clear, specific, and challenging training guidelines that require teachers of advanced placement courses to obtain recognized advanced placement training endorsed by the college board.

Advanced placement and pre-advanced placement training to teachers in Rhode Island high schools must do all of the following:

Provide teachers of advanced placement and teachers in courses that lead to advanced placement with the necessary content knowledge and instructional skills to prepare students for success in advanced placement courses and examinations and other advanced course examinations and mastery of postsecondary course content.

Provide administrators, including principals and counselors, with professional development that will be enable them to create strong and effective advanced placement programs in their schools.

Provide middle grade, junior high, and high school teachers with advanced placement vertical team training and other pre-advanced placement professional development that prepares students for success in advanced placement courses.

Support the implementation of an instructional program for students in grades 6 through 12 that provides an integrated set of instructional materials, diagnostic assessments, and teacher professional development in reading, writing, and mathematics that prepares all students for enrollment and success in advanced placement courses and in college.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 350, § 1.

16-96-5.
Duties of the state board of regents.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the state board of regents shall encourage school districts to offer rigorous courses in grades 6 through 11 that prepare students for the demands of advanced placement course work. The state board of regents shall also encourage school districts to make it a goal that all 10th graders take the Preliminary Scholastic Aptitude Test/National Merit Scholars Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT) so that test results will provide each high school with a database of student assessment data that guidance counselors and teachers will be able to use to identify students who are prepared or who need additional work to be prepared to enroll and be successful in advanced placement courses, using a research-based advanced placement identification program provided by the college board.

The state board of regents shall do all of the following:

Seek federal funding through the advanced placement incentive program and the Math-Science partnership program and use it to support advanced placement and pre-advanced placement teacher professional development and to support the implementation of an integrated instructional program for students in grades 6 through 12 in reading, writing, and mathematics that prepares all students for enrollment and success in advanced placement courses and in college.

Focus state and federal funding with the intent to carry-out activities that target school districts serving high concentrations of low-income students.

Subject to appropriation, provide a plan of communication that includes, without limitation, disseminating to parents materials that emphasize the importance of advanced placement or other advanced courses to a student’s ability to gain access to, and to succeed in, postsecondary education and materials that emphasize the importance of the Preliminary Scholastic Aptitude Test/National Merit Scholars Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT), which provides diagnostic feedback on skills and relates students’ scores to the probability of success in advanced placement courses and examinations, and disseminating this information to students, teachers, counselors, administrators, school districts, public community colleges, and state universities.

Subject to appropriation, annually evaluate the impact of this act on rates of student enrollment and success in advanced placement courses, on high school graduation rates, and on college enrollment retention and completion rates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 350, § 1.

16-96-6.
Notice to be given regarding applications for student financial assistance.

On and after July 1, 2023, the guidance department of every public or private high school in the state shall ensure that notices (the “notice”) are provided to students and their parent, guardian, or responsible adult, regarding the merit and benefits of completing and filing the FAFSA form (the “FAFSA”) and the Rhode Island alternative financial aid application form (the “alternative application”). This notice shall be provided in either the student’s junior year or no later than November 1 of the student’s senior year. The guidance department shall determine the form for providing the notice that shall best ensure the information is communicated both to the student and to the student’s parent, guardian, or responsible adult.

The form of the notice may include, but shall not limited to, a written paper or hard copy writing or an electronic copy. The notice may be provided in multiple formats. A hard copy of the notice shall be kept in the student’s file.

The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A general explanation of what the FAFSA and the alternative application are;

The potential merit to and benefits of completing and submitting a FAFSA or alternative application, including, but not limited to, the awarding of financial aid, income or need-based aid, merit and other scholarship money, the Promise Scholarship, and Pell Grants, to pursue postsecondary education;

A general discussion on what financial aid is and the many forms it can take;

General instructions on how to complete each form; and

Links to the applicable websites shall also be included.

The notice may include referrals to organizations, websites, and other resources to provide more detailed instructions on the completion of the forms.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 297, § 2, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 298, § 2, effective June 29, 2022.